Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.462

Registration.

"Registration" means the registration certificate or license plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of vehicles.

[ 2010 c 161 s 134.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.